Utah statutes.
78B-13-110.   Communication between courts.

(1)  A court of this state may communicate with a court in another state concerning a proceeding arising under this chapter.

(2)  The court may allow the parties to participate in the communication.  If the parties are not able to participate in the communication, the parties shall be given the opportunity to present facts and legal arguments before a decision on jurisdiction is made.

(3)  A communication between courts on schedules, calendars, court records, and similar matters may occur without informing the parties.  A record need not be made of that communication.

(4)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), a record shall be made of the communication.  The parties shall be informed promptly of the communication and granted access to the record.

(5)  For the purposes of this section, "record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that which is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.  A record includes notes or transcripts of a court reporter who listened to a conference call between the courts, an electronic recording of a telephone call, a memorandum or an electronic record of the communication between the courts, or a memorandum or an electronic record made by a court after the communication.

